California statutes. Education Code
 (b) shall not be reported under more than one of the categories specified in those paragraphs.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for children for whom an adjustment factor is applied pursuant to any of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and (5) of subdivision (b), and who are additionally eligible for the adjustment factor established in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), reported child days of enrollment shall be multiplied by the sum of the applicable adjustment factor under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and (5) of subdivision (b) and 0.1.

(f) The difference between the reimbursement resulting from the use of the adjustment factors outlined in subdivision (b) and the reimbursement that would otherwise be received by a provider in the absence of the adjustment factors shall be used for special and appropriate services for each child for whom an adjustment factor is
 claimed.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 13.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 14 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

8244.

(a) In order to reflect the additional expense of serving full-day preschool children who meet any of the criteria outlined in subdivision (b), the contractor’s reported child days of enrollment for these children shall be multiplied by the adjustment factors listed below.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the adjustment factors shall be as follows:

(1) For children with exceptional needs, including children with severe disabilities, the adjustment factor shall be 2.40.

(2) For children at risk of neglect, abuse, or exploitation, the adjustment factor shall be 1.1.

(3) For dual language learner children, the adjustment factor shall be 1.2.

(4) When early childhood mental health consultation services are provided, pursuant to Section 8243, the adjustment factor shall be 1.1.

(5) For children 47 months or younger, the adjustment factor shall be 1.8.

(c) In order to reflect the additional expense of serving part-day preschool children, the contractor’s reported child days of enrollment for children meeting the criteria in paragraph (1), (4), or (5) of subdivision (b) shall be multiplied by the adjustment factors in those subdivisions.

(d) Use of the adjustment factors shall not increase the contractor’s total annual allocation.

(e) (1) Days of enrollment for children who meet more than one of the criteria outlined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and (5) of subdivision (b) shall not be reported under more than one of the categories specified in those paragraphs.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for children for whom an adjustment factor is applied pursuant to any of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and (5) of subdivision (b), and who are additionally eligible for the adjustment factor established in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), reported child days of enrollment shall be multiplied by the sum of the applicable adjustment factor under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and (5) of subdivision (b) and 0.1.

(f) The difference between the reimbursement resulting from the use of the adjustment factors outlined in
 subdivision (b) and the reimbursement that would otherwise be received by a provider in the absence of the adjustment factors shall be used for special and appropriate services for each child for whom an adjustment factor is claimed.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 14.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8245.

(a) For each fiscal year, for the purposes of this chapter, reimbursement rates for full-day California state preschool shall be adjusted by the following reimbursement
 factors:

(1) Prior to January 1, 2022, California state preschool program providers serving children for not less than four hours per day, and less than six and one-half hours per day, the
 reimbursement factor is 75 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2022, California state preschool program providers serving children for not less than six and one-half
 hours per day, and less than 10 and one-half hours per day, the reimbursement factor is 100 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(3) For
 California state preschool program providers serving children for 10 and one-half hours or more per day, the reimbursement factor is 118 percent of the standard reimbursement rate.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, notwithstanding the difference between the standard reimbursement rate and the regional market rate, to support serving children for the length of day that is appropriate under a provider’s contract.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8266.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 90.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8245.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2022–23 fiscal year only, contracting agencies operating a California state preschool program shall be reimbursed according to paragraph (2), if they meet either of the following requirements:

(A) The program is open and operating in accordance with their approved program calendar and remains open and offering services through the program year.

(B) The program operated by the contracting agency is closed by local or state public health order or guidance due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) Reimbursement pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be 100 percent of the contract
 maximum reimbursable amount or net reimbursable program costs, whichever is less, pursuant to guidance released by the Superintendent.

(3) A California state preschool program that is physically closed as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) due to the COVID-19 pandemic, but funded to be operational, shall provide distance learning services, as specified by the Superintendent, for the program. A contractor specified in paragraph (1) shall submit a distance learning plan to the department overseeing their contract pursuant to guidance from the Superintendent.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, reimbursement for full-day and part-day California state preschool family childcare home education network providers for the 2022–23 fiscal year shall be based on the maximum certified hours of care for all families, including families certified for a variable schedule, regardless
 of attendance.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2023, to June 30, 2025, inclusive, if a program is open and operating in accordance with their approved program calendar and remains open and offering services through the program year, the contract reimbursement amount shall be based on the lesser of either of the following:

(1) One hundred percent of the contract maximum reimbursable amount.

(2) Net reimbursable program costs.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2023, and to July 1, 2028, inclusive, reimbursement for full-day and part-day California state preschool family childcare home education network providers shall be based on the maximum certified hours of care for all families, including families certified for a variable schedule, regardless of attendance, less any allowable administrative expenses withheld by the contractor.

(e) If the provisions of subdivisions (c), (d), (f), and (g) are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions
 shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(f) Commencing July 1, 2025, and through June 30, 2026, if a program is open and operating in accordance with its approved program calendar and remains open and providing services to certified children throughout the program year, the contract reimbursement shall be based on the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum reimbursable amount stated in the contract.

(2) Net reimbursable program costs.

(g) Commencing July 1, 2026, the contract reimbursement shall be based on the lesser of the following:

(1) The maximum reimbursable amount stated in the contract.

(2) Net reimbursable program costs.

(3) The product of the adjusted child days of enrollment for certified children times the contract rate set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State Controller shall establish the necessary plans to advance preschool funds to contracting agencies.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8268 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 94.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8247.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt rules, regulations, and guidelines to facilitate the funding and reimbursement procedures required by this chapter.

(b) The Superintendent may establish any regulations the
 Superintendent deems advisable concerning conditions of service and hours of enrollment for children in the programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8269 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 95.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8248.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall support the coordination of resources available to state and local agencies serving preschool through grade 12 children and their families. During times of disaster this shall
 include coordinating resources to support the specific needs of children and families.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8270 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 96.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8249.

In the event that operating agencies are unable to operate due to incomplete repairs and renovations authorized by administrating state agencies, or due to circumstances beyond the control of the operating agency, including earthquakes, floods, or fire, such programs shall not be penalized for incurred program expenses nor in subsequent annual budget allocations.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8271 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 97.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8250.

(a) The rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to Sections 8231 and 8247 shall permit reimbursement for interest paid by contractors on private sector debt financing for the purchase, lease-purchase, repair, or renovation of
 preschool facilities owned or leased by contractors providing center-based preschool.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt regulations requiring contractors to demonstrate that the amount of interest paid in a year on private sector debt financing for the purposes identified in subdivision (a) does not exceed the value obtained by the state in the use of the facilities during the year for the preschool services program. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to,
 the following methods of making this demonstration:

(1) Amortization of a loan or lease-purchase contract on a straight-line basis for the purchase price of a portable building, including any transportation charges, installation charges, loan fees, taxes, points or other fees associated with the purchase, over a period of 15 years or more.

(2) Amortization of a loan or lease-purchase contract on a straight-line basis for the purchase price of a permanent building and real estate, including any loan fees, taxes, points or other fees associated with the purchase, over a period of 15 years or more.

(3) Evidence acceptable to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that loan payments for the purchase of a portable building or permanent building and real estate, including principal and interest, do not exceed the fair
 market rental cost that the contractor would have paid if the property was not purchased.

(c) Loans or lease-purchase agreements amortized over the number of years designated in subdivision (b), but due in a fewer number of years, shall not be disallowed because of the shorter due date.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8272 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 98.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8251.

(a) (1) An agency contracting with the department to provide California state preschool program services may schedule up to five days of staff training, per contract period, using state reimbursement funding on the topics including procedures for emergencies in preschool programs, licensing regulations relating to preschool programs, recognition and reporting of suspected abuse of children in preschool programs, managing challenging behaviors and preventing expulsion of children, meeting the staff professional development requirements under Section 17704 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, improving
 program quality in alignment with state standards and regulations, including, but not limited to, the California Preschool/Transitional Kindergarten Learning Foundations (PTKLF) and the Classroom Assessment Scoring System (CLASS), supporting early literacy and math development, and addressing items on the program’s Quality Rating and Improvement System (QRIS) Quality plan.

(2) Training days may be used as full days or as partial days. Partial days may add up to a maximum of 40 hours of professional development claimed on different days throughout the year.

(b) (1) A day of staff training as described in this section that is scheduled during a contractor’s regular hours of operation without children in attendance shall be considered a day of operation for purposes of meeting the minimum days of operation for part-day and full-day California state preschool programs required pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 8207.

(2) For purposes of reimbursement, contractors may report the child days of enrollment and attendance on days in which the contractor was closed for staff training and children were not in attendance.

(c) (1) Family childcare home providers
 participating in the California state preschool program family childcare home education network pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 8205 who use the staff training days pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid based on the maximum certified hours of care pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 8245.5 during the time in training.

(2) Family childcare home providers participating in the California state preschool program family childcare home education network pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 8205 may use the training days or partial training days to access training offered by the family childcare home education network or training offered by the Joint Child Care Providers United - State of California Training Partnership Fund established pursuant to Section 10277.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 13.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Family Fees [8252. - 8254.]

8252.

(a) The Superintendent shall use the fee schedule developed in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services for families using full-day preschool services pursuant to this chapter, including families receiving services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8211.

(b) Families shall be assessed a single flat monthly fee for all state subsidized early childhood services received, including California state preschool program services and services received through childcare and development programs administered by the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to Section 10290 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The income of a recipient of federal supplemental security income
 benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and state supplemental program benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not be included in total countable income for purposes of determining the amount of the family fee.

(d) Family fees shall be assessed at initial enrollment and reassessed at recertification.

(e) Family fees shall be used by contractors to pay reasonable and necessary costs for providing additional services.

(f) Family fees shall not be based on the cost of care or amount of subsidy payment.

(g) Notwithstanding any other
 provision of this article, family fees shall not be collected for the 2021–22 fiscal year pursuant to Section 263 of Chapter 116 of the Statutes of 2021.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, family fees shall not be collected for the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(2) Contractors shall reimburse providers operating within a family childcare home education network for the full amount of the certificate or voucher without deducting family fees.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, family fees shall not be collected between July 1, 2023, and September 30, 2023, inclusive.

(2) Contractors shall reimburse providers operating within a family childcare home education network for the full amount of the certificate or
 voucher without deducting family fees.

(j) By no later than January 1, 2027, contractors shall pay family childcare providers for California state preschool program services without deducting family fees and shall collect family fees pursuant to this section.

(k) Family fees accrued but uncollected prior to October 1, 2023, may be forgiven and not collected.

(l) (1) A California state preschool program or childcare provider paid with childcare subsidies, including, but not limited to, a family childcare home provider participating in a family childcare home education network, shall not absorb a reduction in pay for the California state preschool program space or voucher on account of a waiver of or reduction in family fees.

(2) The
 number of California state preschool program contracted spaces and childcare contracted spaces shall not be reduced on account of a reduction in the collection of family fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 257, Sec. 14.   (AB 190)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8253.

(a) A family that receives services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8211 may be exempt from family fees for up to one certification period.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a family receiving CalWORKs cash aid shall not be charged a family fee.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, family fees shall not be assessed for the part-day California preschool program to eligible families whose children are enrolled in that program pursuant to
 Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 16.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8254.

(a) The family fee schedule shall provide, among other things, that a contractor or provider may require parents to provide diapers. A contractor or provider offering field trips either may include the cost of the field trips within the service rate charged to the parent or may charge parents an additional fee. Federal or state money shall not be used to reimburse parents for the costs of field trips if those costs are charged as an additional fee. A contractor or family childcare home provider that charges parents an
 additional fee for field trips shall inform parents, before enrolling the child, that a fee may be charged and that no reimbursement will be available.

(b) A contractor or family childcare home provider may require parents to provide diapers or charge parents for field trips, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The contractor or
 family childcare home provider has a written policy adopted by the agency’s governing board that includes parents in the decisionmaking process regarding both of the following:

(A) Whether or not, and how much, to charge for field trip expenses.

(B) Whether or not to require parents to provide diapers.

(2) The contractor or family childcare home provider does not charge fees in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25) per child in a contract year.

(3) The contractor or family childcare home provider does not deny participation in a field trip due to a parent’s inability or refusal to pay the fee.

(4) The contractor or family childcare home provider does not take adverse action against a parent for the parent’s inability or refusal to pay the fee.

(c) A contractor or
 family childcare home provider shall establish a system that prevents the identification of children based on whether or not a child’s family has paid field trip fees.

(d) The contractor or provider shall report expenses incurred and income received for field trips to the department. Income received shall be reported as restricted income.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8273.3 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 104.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Allocations and Expenditures [8255. - 8263.]

8255.

(a) The Superintendent may approve and reimburse startup costs for contracts under this chapter or facilities in an amount not to exceed 15 percent of the expansion or
 increase of each agency’s total contract amount. Under no circumstances shall reimbursement for startup costs result in an increase in the agency’s total award amount. These funds shall be available for all of the following:

(1) The employment and orientation of necessary staff.

(2) The setting up of the program and facility.

(3) The finalization of rental agreements and the making of necessary deposits.

(4) The purchase of a reasonable inventory of materials and supplies.

(5) The purchase of
 an initial premium for insurance.

(b) Agencies shall submit claims for startup costs with their first quarterly reports.

(c) The Legislature recognizes that allowances for startup costs are necessary for the establishment and stability of new preschool programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8275 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 106.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8256.

(a) The department shall promote full utilization of California state preschool program funds and match available unused funds with identified service needs. Notwithstanding the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the department shall arrange interagency adjustments between different contractors with the same type of contract when both agencies mutually
 agree to a temporary transfer of funds for the balance of the fiscal year. The department shall establish timelines for interagency contract fund transfers.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through the issuance of guidance or other written directives, which may include, but is not limited to, establishing timelines for submittal of requests to transfer funds.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8275.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 107.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop a plan and procedures for the allocation of expansion funding balances resulting from the prorata allocation of expansion for the partial year operations of new agencies.

(b) The plan shall provide for the distribution of such funds among contracting agencies whose enrollments include children with special needs and shall limit the
 agencies’ use of these funds to the purchase of approved equipment or materials or one-time-only services, or any of them, that will directly benefit the children with special needs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8276 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 108.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.

Unless specifically exempted by the Legislature, the administrative cost for all state-funded preschool programs and all federal programs administered by the state shall not exceed 15 percent of the funds provided for those programs. Eighty-five percent of these funds shall be used to provide
 services in accordance with rules and regulations, or contractual funding terms and conditions prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8276.7 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 110.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8260.

Each county shall, as a minimum, maintain the level of expenditure for child development services provided by the county during the 1970–71 fiscal year. These funds shall be used exclusively for child development programs and shall be considered unrestricted funds unless restricted by the county granting the funds.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8279 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 123.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8261.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that preschool programs have made valuable contributions towards ensuring that public assistance recipients will be able to accept and maintain employment or employment-related training. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Superintendent ensure that counties comply with the requirements of Section
 8260.

(b) The Superintendent shall ensure each county’s compliance with Section 8260 by not issuing funds to a local preschool contractor within a county until the Superintendent has received written certification from that county that the level of expenditure for childcare services provided by the county has
 been maintained at the 1970–71 fiscal year level pursuant to Section
 8260.
 Funding provided by a county to a local preschool contractor shall not adversely affect the reimbursement received by the agency from the Superintendent pursuant to Section 8242 or 8244.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8279.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 124.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8262.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall publish the methodology and data used, including county-specific data if such data is used, for the allocation of preschool funds. The superintendent shall make this information available to the public, within 90 days of an
 allocation. It is the intent of the Legislature to expedite the allocation of funds to the field as quickly as possible. Nothing in this section shall create a requirement for a public hearing on the allocation methodology prior to the issuance of a request for application.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8279.2 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 125.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8263.

(a) The department shall disburse augmentations to the base allocation for the expansion of preschool programs to promote equal access to preschool services across the state.

(b) (1) In order to provide progress towards achieving access to full-day, full-year preschool services for all income-eligible four-year-old children and to promote access for all income-eligible four-year-old children to attend at least a part-day California state preschool program, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, in awarding new funding appropriated by the Legislature, in any fiscal year, for the expansion of California state preschool programs, use the formula developed pursuant to
 subdivision (c) and may use the priorities identified by local childcare and development planning councils, as provided for in Section 10486 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and other high-quality data resources available to the department.

(2) Expansion funding awarded pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be apportioned at the rate described in Section 8242 and as determined in the annual Budget Act.

(3) A family childcare home education network shall be eligible to apply for expansion funding awarded pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop a formula for prioritizing the disbursement of augmentations pursuant to this section. The formula shall give priority to allocating funds
 to underserved areas. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop the formula by using the definition of “underserved area” in Section 8205 and direct impact indicators of need for preschool services in the county or subcounty areas. For purposes of this section, “subcounty areas” include, but are not limited to, school districts, census tracts, or ZIP Code areas that are deemed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to be most appropriate to the type of program receiving an augmentation. Direct impact indicators of need may include, but are not limited to, the teenage pregnancy rate, the unemployment rate, area household income, or the number or percentage of families receiving public assistance, eligible for Medi-Cal, or eligible for free or reduced-price school meals, and any unique characteristics of the population served by the type of program receiving an
 augmentation.

(d) To promote equal access to services and allocate resources equitably, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop a process for identifying underserved areas and populations within counties. This guidance shall include reference to the direct impact indicators of need described in subdivision (c).

(e) This section does not preclude a local educational agency from subcontracting with an appropriate public or private agency to operate a California state preschool program, subject to Section 18140 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and to apply for funds made available pursuant to this section. If a school district chooses not to operate or subcontract for a California state preschool program, the Superintendent shall work with the county office
 of education and other eligible agencies to explore possible opportunities in contracting or alternative subcontracting to provide a California state preschool program.

(f) This section does not prevent eligible children who are receiving services from continuing to receive those services pursuant to this chapter in future years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 923, Sec. 5.   (SB 1047)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transfer of Information [8264. - 8264.]

8264.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the state makes a substantial, annual investment in preschool programs for eligible families. It is in the best interests of children and their families, and the taxpayers of California, to have information about the development and learning abilities of children developed in these settings, health
 and other information transferred to, or otherwise available to, the pupil’s elementary school.

(b) When a child in a state-funded preschool program will be transferring to a local public school, the preschool program shall provide the parent or guardian with information from the previous year deemed beneficial to the pupil and the public school teacher, including, but not limited to, development issues, social interaction abilities, health background, and diagnostic assessments, if any. The preschool program may, with the permission of the parent or guardian, transfer this information to the pupil’s elementary school.

(c) Any child who has participated in a state subsidized preschool that maintains results-based standards, including the desired results accountability system, may have the performance information transferred to any subsequent or
 concurrent public school setting. Any transferred information shall be in summary form and only accomplished with the permission of the parent or guardian.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8282 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 134.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Local Programs [8265. - 8272.5.]

8265.

The governing board of any school district or a county superintendent of schools with the approval of the county board of education is authorized to establish and maintain preschool programs upon the approval of, and subject to the regulations of the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8320 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 145.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8266.

(a) The county superintendent of schools in each county, with the approval of the county board of education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall have the authority to establish and maintain
 preschool programs and centers in the same manner and to the same extent as governing boards of school or community college districts, except that nothing in this section shall be construed as vesting in the county superintendents of schools any authority to alone effect the levy and collection of any county, school, or other local taxes for the support of any preschool programs.

(b) The establishment and maintenance of any
 preschool program by the county superintendent of schools shall be undertaken, subject to the prior approval of both the county board of education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, upon the application of one or more school districts under the county superintendent’s jurisdiction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8321 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 146.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8267.

The governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools may do the following:

(a) Accommodate in a preschool facility maintained by it children residing in another district, upon terms and under conditions agreed upon by the governing boards of both districts.

(b) Permit the use of, and furnish maintenance for, buildings, grounds, and equipment, and the use of existing administrative personnel for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the preschool services or facilities maintained by it that are not in conflict with law or the standards and regulations established for child development services by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8322 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 147.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8268.

The employees of school districts or community college districts, or county superintendents of schools in preschool services under this division shall have the same rights and privileges as are granted to employees of the same agencies in children’s centers.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8324 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 148.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8269.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a public or private agency, a school district, a community college district or a county superintendent of schools operating preschool facilities may enter into an agreement with the Employment Development Department
 that will provide an opportunity to participants in work incentive programs under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code for training in child development facilities. Training pursuant to that agreement shall have the objective of preparation for a career in the field of child development.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8326 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 150.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8270.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the governing board of a school district or community college district, county superintendent of schools, or other unit of local general purpose government may enter into agreements with any city, city and county, or other public agency, or with a private foundation, nonprofit corporation, or proprietary agency for the furnishing to, or use by, the governing
 board, county superintendent of schools, or other unit of local general purpose government in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, of property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment and other necessary items and such city, county, city and county, other public agency, or private foundation or nonprofit corporation, is authorized to enter into such agreements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8327 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 151.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8271.

(a) The governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools shall establish in the county treasury a fund to be known as the “child development fund” into which shall be paid all funds received by the district or the county for, or from the operation of,
 preschool services under this chapter. The costs incurred in the maintenance and operation of preschool services shall be paid from the fund, with accounting to reflect specific funding sources.

(b) Funds of
 a district derived from the receipt of district taxes or derived from moneys apportioned to the district for the support of schools thereof, in addition to state moneys appropriated for the support of
 preschool services, fees, and federal funds, may be expended for, or in connection
 with, preschool services.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8328 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 152.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8272.

The governing board of any school district maintaining a preschool program may include in its budget the amount necessary to initiate, operate, and maintain a preschool program pursuant to this chapter
 and the board of supervisors shall levy a school district tax necessary to raise that amount. The tax shall be in addition to any other school district tax authorized by law to be levied.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8329 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 153.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8272.5.

Community college districts that levied child development permissive override taxes pursuant to Section 8272 and former Section 8330 in the 1977–78 fiscal year and received fiscal relief pursuant to Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979 to compensate for the loss of permissive override taxes shall
 not receive reimbursement for